Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.117

Animal fighting—Prohibited behavior—Penalty—Exceptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1149-S.SL) ***

(1) A person commits the crime of animal fighting if the person knowingly does any of the following or causes a minor to do any of the following:

(a) Owns, possesses, keeps, breeds, trains, buys, sells, or advertises or offers for sale any animal with the intent that the animal shall be engaged in an exhibition of fighting with another animal;

(b) Promotes, organizes, conducts, participates in, is a spectator of, advertises, prepares, or performs any service in the furtherance of, an exhibition of animal fighting, transports spectators to an animal fight, or provides or serves as a stakeholder for any money wagered on an animal fight;

(c) Keeps or uses any place for the purpose of animal fighting, or manages or accepts payment of admission to any place kept or used for the purpose of animal fighting;

(d) Suffers or permits any place over which the person has possession or control to be occupied, kept, or used for the purpose of an exhibition of animal fighting;

(e) Steals, takes, leads away, possesses, confines, sells, transfers, or receives an animal with the intent of using the animal for animal fighting, or for training or baiting for the purpose of animal fighting; or

(f) Owns, possesses, buys, sells, transfers, or manufactures animal fighting paraphernalia for the purpose of engaging in, promoting, or facilitating animal fighting, or for baiting a live animal for the purpose of animal fighting.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021;

(b) A person who intentionally mutilates an animal in furtherance of an animal fighting offense as described in subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the following:

(a) The use of dogs in the management of livestock, as defined by chapter 16.57 RCW, by the owner of the livestock or the owner's employees or agents or other persons in lawful custody of the livestock;

(b) The use of dogs in hunting as permitted by law; or

(c) The training of animals or the use of equipment in the training of animals for any purpose not prohibited by law.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "animal fighting paraphernalia" includes equipment, products, implements, or materials of any kind that are used, intended for use, or designed for use in the training, preparation, conditioning, or furtherance of animal fighting, and includes, but is not limited to: Cat mills; fighting pits; springpoles; unprescribed veterinary medicine; treatment supplies; and gaffs, slashers, heels, and any other sharp implement designed to be attached in place of the natural spur of a cock or game fowl.

[ 2019 c 174 s 1; 2015 c 235 s 3; 2006 c 287 s 1; 2005 c 481 s 3; 1994 c 261 s 11; 1982 c 114 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.